Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2725
Accounts and transfers nontestamentary.

Except as provided in sections 30-2313 to 30-2319 (elective share of surviving spouse) or as a consequence of, and to the extent directed by, section 30-2726, a transfer resulting from the application of section 30-2723 is effective by reason of the terms of the account involved and sections 30-2716 to 30-2733 and is not testamentary or subject to sections 30-2201 to 30-2512 (estate administration).

Laws 1993, LB 250, § 11.